pig.foma
# This script defines the function PigLatin() that translates
# English strings to Pig Latin. For example, PigLatin(p i g)
# yields the string igpay.
# We need a list of consonants Cons and a list of vowels Vow.
define Cons [ b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ];
define Vow [ a e i o u ];

# CrossP(X) builds a crossproduct of X marking the center
# with a period.
define CrossP(X) [X %. X];

# AddW(X) adds an initial w to the duplicated word if it begins
# with a vowel
define AddW(X) [ X .o. %. -> {.w} || _ Vow];

# DelCons(X) deletes any initial consonants from X.
define DelCons(X)[X .o. Cons+ @-> 0 || .#. _ ] ;

# TailToAy(X) replaces any trailing vowels of X with ay;
define TailToAy(X) [X .o. Vow ?* @-> {ay} || %. Cons* _ ];

# DelMiddle(X) Deletes any periods in X.
define DelMiddle(X) [X .o. %. -> 0];

# PigLatin(X) applies the functions defined above in the given
# order and extracts the lower side of the result.
define PigLatin(X) [DelMiddle(TailToAy(DelCons(AddW(CrossP(X)))))].l;

read regex PigLatin(p i g);
